Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB890.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1721 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1721. Veterans' Trust Fund.* * *(c.1) Unauthorized purposes.--(1) The department may not expend money from the Veterans' Trust Fund to pay the salaries of administrative staff. As used in this paragraph, the term "administrative staff" means an individual employed in the business of a veterans' organization or other charitable organization with a primary mission to serve Pennsylvania veterans. The term does not include clinical staff or an individual who serves 123456789101112131415161718 in a role of providing medical care to veterans or their families.(2) The department may not expend money from the Veterans' Trust Fund for grants, funding or other assistance to a single entity for an amount totaling more than $250,000 over a period of three consecutive years.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0890PN0930 - 2 - 12345678